Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0569.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 5431. (1) A health professional in charge of the care of a newborn infant or, if none, the health professional in charge at the birth of an infant shall administer or cause to be administered to the infant a test for each of the following: (a) Phenylketonuria. (b) Galactosemia. (c) Hypothyroidism. (d) Maple syrup urine disease. (e) Biotinidase deficiency. (f) Sickle cell anemia. (g) Congenital adrenal hyperplasia. (h) Medium-chain acyl-coenzyme A dehydrogenase deficiency. (i) Other treatable but otherwise disabling conditions as designated by the department. (2) The informed consent requirements of sections 17020 and 17520 do not apply to the tests required under subsection (1). The tests required under subsection (1) must be administered and reported within a time and under conditions prescribed by the department. The department may require that the tests be performed by the department. (3) If the results of a test administered under subsection (1) are positive, the results must be reported to the infantâs parents, guardian, or person in loco parentis. A person is in compliance with this subsection if the person makes a good-faith effort to report the positive test results to the infantâs parents, guardian, or person in loco parentis. (4) Subject to the annual adjustment required under this subsection and subject to subsection (6), if the department performs 1 or more of the tests required under subsection (1), the department may charge a fee for the tests of not more than $53.71. The department shall adjust the amount prescribed by this subsection annually by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative annual percentage change in the Detroit Consumer Price Index. As used in this subsection, âDetroit Consumer Price Indexâ means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (5) A person who violates this section or a rule promulgated under this part is guilty of a misdemeanor. (6) The department shall provide for a hardship waiver of the fee authorized under subsection (4) under circumstances found appropriate by the department. (7) The department shall do all of the following in regard to the blood specimens taken for purposes of conducting the tests required under subsection (1): (a) By April 1, 2000, develop a schedule for the retention and disposal of the blood specimens used for the tests after the tests are completed. The schedule must meet at least all of the following requirements: (i) Be consistent with nationally recognized standards for laboratory accreditation and federal law. (ii) Require that the disposal be conducted in compliance with section 13811. (iii) Require that the disposal be conducted in the presence of a witness. For purposes of this subparagraph, the witness may be an individual involved in the disposal or any other individual. (iv) Require that a written record of the disposal be made and kept, and that the witness required under subparagraph (iii) signs the record. (b) Allow the blood specimens to be used for medical research during the retention period established under subdivision (a), as long as the medical research is conducted in a manner that preserves the confidentiality of the test subjects and is consistent to protect human subjects from research risks under 45 CFR 46.101 to 46.124. (8) The department shall rewrite its pamphlet explaining the requirements of this section when the supply of pamphlets in existence on March 15, 2000 is exhausted. When the department rewrites the explanatory pamphlet, the department shall include at least all of the following information in the pamphlet: (a) The nature and purpose of the testing program required under this section, including, but not limited to, a brief description of each condition or disorder listed in subsection (1). (b) The purpose and value of the infantâs parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis retaining a blood specimen obtained under subsection (9) in a safe place. (c) The departmentâs schedule for retaining and disposing of blood specimens developed under subsection (7)(a). (d) That the blood specimens taken for purposes of conducting the tests required under subsection (1) may be used for medical research pursuant to subsection (7)(b). (9) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1), the health professional described in subsection (1) or the hospital or other facility in which the birth of an infant takes place, or both, may offer to draw an additional blood specimen from the infant. If such an offer is made, it must be made to the infantâs parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis at the time the blood specimens are drawn for purposes of subsection (1). If the infantâs parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis accepts the offer of an additional blood specimen, the blood specimen must be preserved in a manner that does not require special storage conditions or techniques, including, but not limited to, lamination. The health professional or hospital or other facility employee making the offer shall explain to the parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis at the time the offer is made that the additional blood specimen can be used for future identification purposes and should be kept in a safe place. The health professional or hospital or other facility making the offer may charge a fee that is not more than the actual cost of obtaining and preserving the additional blood specimen. (10) Beginning for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter through September 30, 2029, $1,000,000.00 of the collected newborn screening fees and any interest and earnings for those fees is transferred to and must be deposited into the general fund. Sec. 5841. (1) All or part of the charges for the medical care and treatment of a child or youth with special health care needs must be paid to the department of treasury by the child, parent, or spouse, if that individual has the ability to pay. The payment must be in the amount and at a rate determined by agreement between the individual and the department. Upon treatment of the child or youth with special health care needs, the department shall furnish the department of treasury information required to keep a correct account of the money due this state from the child, parent, or spouse. The department of treasury shall credit the parent participation payments to the parent participation fund. (2) The department may modify or cancel an agreement made under this section based on economic or other factors and shall report that action to the department of treasury. (3) The department of treasury may accept and issue a receipt for an amount due under an agreement or modification to an agreement under this section. (4) Beginning for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter through September 30, 2029, $220,000.00 of the money in the parent participation fund in subsection (1) and any interest and earnings for those fees is transferred to and must be deposited into the general fund. Sec. 13104. (1) An individual shall not tattoo, brand, or perform body piercing on another individual unless the tattooing, branding, or body piercing occurs at a body art facility licensed under this part. Any tattooing, branding, or body piercing occurring in this state other than at a facility licensed under this part is considered an imminent danger under section 2251 or 2451 and the department or a local health department shall order the immediate cessation of that activity in the manner prescribed in this act. (2) The owner or operator of a body art facility shall apply to the department for a body art facility license under this part on a form provided by the department and at the time of application shall pay to the department the appropriate fee prescribed under subsection (4). The department shall issue a license on an annual basis to a body art facility that meets the requirements of this part or for a time period not to exceed 14 consecutive days to a temporary body art facility that meets the requirements of this part. (3) If the department determines that the application is complete and the body art facility proposed or operated by the applicant meets the requirements of this part and any rules promulgated under this part, the department shall issue the appropriate license to the applicant for the operation of that body art facility. Except for a temporary license issued under this part, the license is effective for up to 1 year and expires at 12 midnight on December 31. A temporary license issued under this part is effective for not more than 14 consecutive days and expires at 12 midnight on the date prescribed on the temporary license. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this part, the applicant shall pay 1 of the following fees at the time of application for a body art facility license: (a) For an annual license $ 500.00. (b) For a temporary license to operate a body art facility at a fixed location for not more than 14 consecutive days $ 150.00. (5) An applicant for a new annual license that is filed on or after July 1 shall only pay 50% of the fee prescribed in subsection (4)(a). A licensee that fails to submit an application for a license renewal on or before December 1, in addition to the license fee under subsection (4)(a), shall pay an additional $250.00 late fee. (6) The department shall issue a duplicate license upon request of a licensee and the payment of a duplicate license fee of $50.00. (7) Unless a different distribution is provided for in a cost reimbursement program under sections 2471 to 2498, the department shall distribute a portion of a fee collected under this section from an applicant or licensee to a local health department authorized to enforce this part under section 13108 as follows: (a) From the annual license fee under subsection (4)(a) or (5) and, if applicable, from the late fee under subsection (5), 50%. (b) From the temporary license fee under subsection (4)(b), 75%. (c) From the duplicate license fee under subsection (6), 50%. (8) The department shall adjust the fees prescribed in this section annually by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative annual percentage change in the Detroit-Ann Arbor-Flint Consumer Price Index, but not by an amount that exceeds 5%. As used in this subsection, âDetroit-Ann Arbor-Flint Consumer Price Indexâ means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn, Ann Arbor, and Flint areas from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (9) Beginning for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter through September 30, 2029, $100,000.00 of the collected body art facility license fees and any interest and earnings for those fees is transferred to and must be deposited into the general fund. Sec. 16315. (1) The health professions regulatory fund is established in the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the state treasurer shall credit the fees collected under sections 16319 to 16349 to the health professions regulatory fund. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the money in the health professions regulatory fund must be expended only as provided in subsection (5). (2) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the health professions regulatory fund. Interest and earnings from health professions regulatory fund investment must be credited to the health professions regulatory fund. (3) The unencumbered balance in the health professions regulatory fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the health professions regulatory fund and does not revert to the general fund. (4) The health professions regulatory fund may receive gifts and devises and other money as provided by law. (5) The department shall use the health professions regulatory fund to carry out its powers and duties, including, but not limited to, reimbursing the department of attorney general for the reasonable cost of services provided to the department under this article, article 7, and article 8. (6) The nurse professional fund is established in the state treasury. Of the money that is attributable to per-year license fees collected under section 16327, the state treasurer shall credit $8.00 of each individual annual license fee collected to the nurse professional fund. The money in the nurse professional fund must be expended only as provided in subsection (9). (7) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the nurse professional fund, and shall credit interest and earnings from the investment to the nurse professional fund. The nurse professional fund may receive gifts and devises and other money as provided by law. (8) The unencumbered balance in the nurse professional fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the nurse professional fund and does not revert to the general fund. (9) The department of health and human services shall use the nurse professional fund each fiscal year only as follows: (a) To promote safe patient care in all nursing practice environments. (b) To advance the safe practice of the nursing profession. (c) To ensure a continuous supply of high-quality direct care nurses, nursing faculty, and nursing education programs. (d) To operate a nursing scholarship program. (10) The pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund is established in the state treasury. (11) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund. Interest and earnings from investment of the pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund must be credited to the pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund. (12) The unencumbered balance in the pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund and does not revert to the general fund. The pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund may receive gifts and devises and other money as provided by law. Twenty dollars of the license fee received by the department under section 16319 must be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund. The department shall use the pain management education and controlled substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion fund only in connection with programs relating to pain management education for health professionals, preventing the diversion of controlled substances, and development and maintenance of the electronic monitoring system for controlled substances data required by section 7333a. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor